Massachusetts, session 194th, H2480.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47AA the following section:-
Section 47BB. When any individual or group blanket accident and sickness insurance
policy and health service contract delivered, issued or renewed by an insurer or nonprofit health
service corporation provides for payment of surgical first assisting benefits or services on behalf
of individual subscribers and members within the commonwealth or all group members having a
principal place of employment within the commonwealth, such provision shall be construed as
providing for payment of a registered nurse, licensed under section 80B of chapter 112, who
provided such first assistant services.
of 3

SECTION 2. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8DD the following section:-
Section 8EE. When any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an
individual or group hospital service plan delivered, issued or renewed in the commonwealth
provides for the payment of surgical first assisting benefits on behalf of individual subscribers
and members within the commonwealth and to all group members having a principal place of
employment within the commonwealth, such provisions shall be construed as providing for
payment of a registered nurse, licensed under section 80B of chapter 112, who provided such
first assistant services.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4DD the following section:-
Section 4EE. When provisions for payment for surgical first assisting benefits or services
exist in any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
delivered, issued or renewed in the commonwealth, such provisions shall be construed as
providing for payment of a registered nurse, licensed under section 80B of chapter 112, who
provided such first assistant services.
SECTION 4. Section 4 of chapter 176G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word "period." in line 46, the following sentence: Such health maintenance
organization contract, when providing for payment of surgical first assisting benefits or services,
shall be construed as providing for payment of a registered nurse, licensed under section 80B of
chapter 112, providing first assistant services
of 3

SECTION 5. (a) The department of' public health shall prepare a report on the provision
of services by registered nurse first assistants and its effect on the quality of care for patients.
Said report shall be a compilation of data reported by hospitals licensed under chapter 111 and
insurers licensed under chapters 175, 176A, 176B and 176G. Such hospitals and insurers shall
collect and report data that includes, but is not limited to, nursing data describing outcomes of
the registered nurse first assistant, and may consider outcome measures which differentiate
between severity of patient illness, mortality and morbidity rates, adverse complications, patient
and family satisfaction with nursing care, patient safety, pain management, skin integrity
management, medication administration and management, patient education and discharge
planning.
(b) The commissioner of public health shall prepare said report in consultation with the
commissioner of insurance, the director of the board of registration in nursing, the Massachusetts
Nurses Association, Massachusetts Chapter I of the Association of PeriOperative Registered
Nurses and the Massachusetts Hospital Association.
(c) The department shall file said report with the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the joint committee on health care financing not later than September 1, 2026.
of 3